Alabama, session 2026rs, HB87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
term "deer corn" shall mean any shelled corn sold, or
otherwise held out, for wild deer consumption.
(b) The gross proceeds from the sale of deer corn are
exempt from state sales and use taxes.
(c) Any county or municipality may exempt the gross
proceeds from the sale of deer corn from county or municipal
sales and use taxes in accordance with Section 40-23-4.01,
Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB87 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Ways and Means
Education

Read for the second time and placed ................14-Jan-26
on the calendar:
0 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................20-Jan-26
as amended
Yeas 79
Nays 1
Abstains 22


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 2